Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
481

FAIR TRADE
REGULATIONS

Part I. Unfair Practices Act

Section

481-1 Unlawful practices

481-2 Officers and agents

481-3 Sales at less than cost

481-4 Purchase at forced or bankrupt sales

481-5 Proof of intent; cost surveys

481-6 When sale at less than cost permitted

481-7 Rebates, refunds, etc.

481-8 Duty of attorney general to prosecute

481-9 Illegal contracts

481-9.5 Automatic renewal clauses and continuous
service

clauses

481-10 Actions to enjoin violation

481-11 Remedies cumulative

Part II. Sale of United States Surplus
Goods

481-21 Findings and declaration of public policy

481-22 Unauthorized use of certain trade names
prohibited

481-23 Fraudulent representation of origin of
goods

481-24 Advertising or display requirements

481-25 Additional display requirements

481-26 Penalty

481-27 Injunctions

Cross References

Cybersquatting, see §§481B-21 to 25.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next